Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2608.01
Protected consumer; security freeze; duration; consumer reporting agency; restrictions on release of information.

A security freeze for a protected consumer shall remain in effect unless removed in accordance with section 8-2608.02 or 8-2608.03. A consumer reporting agency may not release the protected consumer’s credit report, any information derived from the protected consumer’s credit report, or any record created for the protected consumer.

Laws 2016, LB835, § 9.